Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1308
Statement of record; examination by agency.

Upon receipt of a statement of record in proper form, the agency shall forthwith initiate an examination to determine that:

(1) The developer can convey or cause to be conveyed the interest in a retirement subdivision or community offered for disposition if the purchaser complies with the terms of the offer, and when appropriate, that release clauses, conveyances in trust, or other safeguards have been provided;

(2) There is reasonable assurance that all proposed improvements will be completed as represented;

(3) Such developer and managing agent have not, or if not an individual, its officers, directors, and principals have not, been convicted of a crime involving land dispositions or any aspect of the land sales business in this state, the United States, or any other state or foreign country and have not been subject to any injunction or administrative order restraining a false or misleading promotional plan involving land dispositions; and

(4) The public-offering statement and other requirements of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 have been satisfied.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 7.